District of Columbia statutes.
1-905.02

Eligibility and benefits determinations.

Eligibility and the calculation of the amount of the benefit payment for covered District employees for service accrued after June 30, 1997, shall be determined in accordance with the retirement program applicable to covered District employees in effect as of June 30, 1997 (except as otherwise amended by Title XI of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (P.L. 105-33; 111 Stat. 963)).

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 122, 45 DCR 4045
Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-783.2.
This section is referenced in § 1-903.01 and § 1-903.02.